HFST_Tutorial/chv.lexc
Multichar_Symbols

%<n%>                ! Noun
%<pl%>               ! Plural
%<nom%>              ! Nominative case
%<ins%>              ! Instrumental Case
%<gen%>              ! General Case
%{A%}                                 ! Ending "e" or "a"
%{м%}                                 ! -M / -h
%{Ă%}                                 ! -end words
%<der_лӑх%>
%{ъ%}				 ! Loan Words 
%>                   ! Morpheme boundary

LEXICON Root

Guesser ;
Nouns ; 

LEXICON Guesser

🂡%<guess%>:🂡 N ;

LEXICON CASES 

%<nom%>: # ;
%<gen%>:%>%{Ă%}н # ;
%<ins%>:%>п%{A%} # ;

LEXICON PLURAL

                         CASES ;
%<pl%>:%>се%{м%} CASES ;

LEXICON SUBST 

!%<nom%>: # ;   
PLURAL ; 

LEXICON DER-N

%<der_лӑх%>:%>л%{Ă%}х SUBST "weight: 1.0" ; 

LEXICON N

%<n%>: SUBST ;
%<n%>: DER-N ;

LEXICON Nouns

урам:урам N ;     ! "улица"
пакча:пакча N ;   ! "сад"
хула:хула N ;     ! "город"
канаш:канаш N ;   ! "совет"
тӗс:тӗс N ;       ! "вид"
патша:патша N ;   ! "царь"
куҫ:куҫ N ;       ! "глаз
специалист:специалист%{ъ%} N ; ! "специалист"
